Utah statutes.
4-34-5.   Limitation of liability of donor, charitable organization and
county.
Except in the event of an injury resulting from gross negligence,
recklessness, or intentional conduct, neither a county nor an agency of a
county nor a donor of an agricultural product participating in good faith in a
food donation program, nor a nonprofit charitable organization receiving,
accepting, gleaning, or distributing any agricultural product donated in good
faith to it under this chapter shall be liable for damages in any civil action
or subject to prosecution in any criminal proceeding for any injury that
occurs as a result of any act or the omission of any act, including injury
resulting from ingesting the donated agricultural product.
